Washington statutes.
RCW 36.08.040

Local officers to serve out terms.

All township, precinct, school, and road district officers within the transferred territory shall continue to hold their respective offices within the county to which they may be transferred until their respective terms of office expire, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.08.040. Prior: 1891 c 144 s 4; RRS s 3975.]